Washington statutes.
RCW 43.01.020

Oath of office.

The governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, treasurer, auditor, attorney general, superintendent of public instruction, commissioner of public lands, and insurance commissioner, shall, before entering upon the duties of their respective offices, take and subscribe an oath or affirmation in substance as follows: I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will support the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution and laws of the state of Washington, and that I will faithfully discharge the duties of the office of (name of office) to the best of my ability.

The oath or affirmation shall be administered by one of the justices of the supreme court at the capitol. A certificate shall be affixed thereto by the person administering the oath, and the oath or affirmation so certified shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state before the officer shall be qualified to discharge any official duties: PROVIDED, That the oath of the secretary of state shall be filed in the office of the state auditor.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.01.020. Prior: 1909 c 43 s 1; RRS s 10981.]

NOTES:

Attorney general, oath of office: RCW 43.10.010.

Commissioner of public lands, oaths of employees: RCW 43.12.021.

Court commissioners, oath of office: RCW 2.24.020.

Engineers and land surveyors' board of registration, oath required: RCW 18.43.030.

Horse racing commission, oath of office: RCW 67.16.012.

Judges of superior court, oath of office: State Constitution Art. 4 s 28; RCW 2.08.080, 2.08.180.

Judges of supreme court, oath of office: State Constitution Art. 4 s 28; RCW 2.04.080.

Liquor and cannabis board, oath of office: RCW 66.08.014.

Militia, oath of office: RCW 38.12.150, 38.12.160.

Oaths, mode of administering: State Constitution Art. 1 s 6.

Perjury, oath defined: RCW 9A.72.010.

State administrative officers, oath required: RCW 43.17.030.

State auditor, oath of office: RCW 43.09.010.

State treasurer, oath of office: RCW 43.08.020.

University of Washington, board of regents, oath required: RCW 28B.10.520.

Utilities and transportation commission: RCW 80.01.020.

Washington State University, board of regents: RCW 28B.10.520.